Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1208
Job training grant; relocation, abandonment, or sale; effect.

If a business relocates or abandons its site during the grant disbursement period, the disbursements made to the business shall be immediately due and payable to the Department of Economic Development. If a business is sold during the grant disbursement period, the disbursements made to the business shall be immediately due and payable to the department unless the purchaser agrees to carry out the terms and conditions of the business plan.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 7.